Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.100

Investigation of applicant's background.

Each applicant shall, as part of his or her application, furnish written consent to an investigation of his or her personal background, professional training, and experience by the department or any person acting on its behalf.

[ 1985 c 326 s 10.]